Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-903. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Adjudication of guilt” or other words of similar import mean a:

Plea of guilty;

Plea of nolo contendere;

Negotiated plea;

Finding of guilt by a judge; or

Finding of guilt by a jury;

“Administration of criminal justice” means performing functions of investigation, apprehension, detention, prosecution, adjudication, correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders.

“Administration of criminal justice” also includes criminal identification activities and the collection, maintenance, and dissemination of criminal justice information;

“Aggravated sex offense” means an offense in the Arkansas Code substantially equivalent to “aggravated sexual abuse” as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2241 as it existed on March 1, 2003, which principally encompasses:

Causing another person to engage in a sexual act:

By using force against that other person; or

By threatening or placing or attempting to threaten or place that other person in fear that any person will be subjected to death, serious bodily injury, or kidnapping;

Knowingly:

Rendering another person unconscious and then engaging in a sexual act with that other person; or

Administering to another person by force or threat of force, or without the knowledge or permission of that person, a drug, intoxicant, or similar substance and thereby:

Substantially impairing the ability of that other person to appraise or control conduct; and

Engaging or attempting to engage in a sexual act with that other person; or

Sexual assault in the first degree, § 5-14-124;

Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;

Sexual assault in the third degree, § 5-14-126;

Sexual assault in the fourth degree, § 5-14-127;

Incest, § 5-26-202;

Engaging children in sexually explicit conduct for use in visual or print medium, § 5-27-303;

Transportation of minors for prohibited sexual conduct, § 5-27-305;

Employing or consenting to the use of a child in a sexual performance, § 5-27-402;

Pandering or possessing visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child, § 5-27-304;

Producing, directing, or promoting a sexual performance by a child, § 5-27-403;

Promoting prostitution in the first degree, § 5-70-104;

Stalking, § 5-71-229, when ordered by the sentencing court to register as a sex offender;

Indecent exposure, § 5-14-112, if a felony level offense;

Exposing another person to human immunodeficiency virus, § 5-14-123, when ordered by the sentencing court to register as a sex offender;

Kidnapping pursuant to § 5-11-102(a), when the victim is a minor and the offender is not the parent of the victim;

False imprisonment in the first degree and false imprisonment in the second degree, §§ 5-11-103 and 5-11-104, when the victim is a minor and the offender is not the parent of the victim;

Permitting abuse of a minor, § 5-27-221, if the abuse of the minor consisted of sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or sexual contact;

Computer child pornography, § 5-27-603;

Computer exploitation of a child, § 5-27-605;

Permanent detention or restraint, § 5-11-106, when the offender is not the parent of the victim;

Distributing, possessing, or viewing of matter depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child, § 5-27-602;

Internet stalking of a child, § 5-27-306;

Crime of video voyeurism, § 5-16-101, if a felony level offense;

Voyeurism, § 5-16-102, if a felony level offense;

Which is similar to any of the offenses enumerated in subdivision (13)(A)(i) of this section;

When the adjudication of guilt requires registration under sex offender registration laws of another state or jurisdiction; or

If the conviction was for a violation of:

The sentencing court has the authority to order the registration of any offender shown in court to have attempted to commit or to have committed a sex offense even though the offense is not enumerated in subdivision (13)(A)(i) of this section.

This authority applies to sex offenses enacted, renamed, or amended at a later date by the General Assembly unless the General Assembly expresses its intent not to consider the offense to be a true sex offense for the purposes of this subchapter;

A person previously classified as a sexually violent predator is now considered a sexually dangerous person;

“Sexually violent offense” means any state, federal, tribal, or military offense which includes a sexual act as defined in 18 U.S.C. §§ 2241 and 2242 as they existed on March 1, 2003, with another person if the offense is nonconsensual regardless of the age of the victim;

(A)“Social media account” means a personal account with an electronic medium or service in which a user may create, share, or access user-generated content, including without limitation:

A video;

A photograph;

A blog post;

A podcast;

A transmission or message; or

An email.

“Social media account” includes without limitation an account established with:

Facebook;

Twitter;

LinkedIn;

MySpace;

Instagram;

Snapchat;

YouTube; or

Any other similar format, program, application, or internet service; and

A screen name;

A user identification; or

A user name.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (12)(A)(i), deleted “in the first degree” at the end of (u), deleted (x), which read: “Computer child pornography, §5-27-603,” deleted (y), which read: “Computer exploitation of a child, §5-27-605,” redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly, and substituted “this subdivision (12)(A)(i)” for “subdivisions (12)(A)(i)(a)-(y) of this section” in (aa).

The 2013 amendment by No. 172 rewrote (10)(B).

The 2013 amendment by No. 505 substituted “a‘sexually dangerous person’” for “‘sexually violent predators’” in (13) (now (12)); redesignated former (15) as (15)(A) (now (14)(A)); substituted “dangerous person” for “violent predator” in (15)(A) (now (14)(A)); and added (15)(B) (now (14)(B)).

The 2013 amendment by No. 508 rewrote (12)(A)(iii) (now (13)(A)(iii)); and added (12)(A)(v) and (12)(A)(vi) (now (13)(A)(v) and (vi)).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1114 added (12)(A)(i)(bb) (now (13)(A)(i)(bb) ).

The 2015 amendment by No. 357 added (12)(A)(i)(cc) and (dd) (now (13)(A)(i)(cc) and (dd) ).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1285 rewrote (12)(A)(i)(s) (now (13)(A)(i)(s) ).

The 2017 amendment by No. 664 added (13)(A)(i)(ee) .

The 2017 amendment by No. 916 added (16) (“Social media account”) and (17) (“Social media account information”).

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statute Including “Sexually Motivated Offenses” Within Definition of Sex Offense for Purposes of Sentencing or Classification of Defendant as Sex Offender. 30 A.L.R.6th 373.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Criminal Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 429.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

Sentencing court had authority to order the registration of a defendant as a sexual offender because the defendant's crime of public sexual indecency was classified as a sexual offense, under §5-14-111, and because subdivision (13)(B)(ii) of this section did not restrict the sentencing court's authority to order registration for a person's conviction as a sex offender for a sexual offense neither enumerated in subdivision (13)(A)(i) of this section nor included under the provisions of subdivision (13)(B)(ii). Fountain v. State, 103 Ark. App. 15, 285 S.W.3d 706 (2008).

Giving effect to subdivisions (13)(A) and (13)(B) of this section, subdivision (13)(B)(ii) does not restrict a sentencing court's authority to order registration for a person's conviction as a sex offender for a sexual offense neither enumerated in subdivision (13)(A)(i) nor included under the provisions of subdivision (13)(B)(ii).Fountain v. State, 103 Ark. App. 15, 285 S.W.3d 706 (2008).

Defendant could not be certified as an habitual child sex offender since his prior juvenile delinquency adjudication could not be considered a prior conviction under the 1987 version of this subchapter. Snyder v. State, 332 Ark. 279, 965 S.W.2d 121 (1998).

Defendant's second-degree sexual abuse conviction under former §5-14-109 did not require defendant's lifetime sex offender registration; the crime was not substantially equivalent to aggravated sexual abuse under 18 U.S.C. § 2241, since second-degree sexual abuse did not require the use of force and required only sexual contact, while aggravated sexual abuse under the federal statute required a sexual act, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2246(2)(D).Myers v. State, 2017 Ark. App. 617, 535 S.W.3d 301 (2017).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of failure to comply with registration requirements under the Sex Offender Registration Act based on his failure to report a change of address because defendant, who registered as a homeless resident of Marion County, was required to wear an electronic ankle monitor with a GPS tracking system; with the use of the GPS technology, the State introduced documentation that defendant had not been in his usual overnight location in Marion County, or any other location in Marion County, for a period of 13 consecutive days; and, contrary to defendant's argument, the evidence established more than a mere temporary relocation to Boone County to periodically recharge his electronic ankle monitor.Wilson v. State, 2016 Ark. App. 164, 485 S.W.3d 698 (2016).

Section §12-12-909 requires sex offenders to report changes in employment 10 days before they occur and this section provides sex offenders with an affirmative defense if they notify authorities no later than five days after changing employment; reading the two statutes together makes it clear that a defendant must notify authorities 10 days prior to changing employment, absent an affirmative defense, and since the loss of employment constitutes a change, §12-12-904 and this section do not allow a 30-day grace period for reporting a change in employment. Mashburn v. State, 87 Ark. App. 89, 189 S.W.3d 73 (2004).

Definition of “residency” for purposes of registration in this section appears in a different chapter of the Arkansas Code than the residency restriction in §5-14-128(a), and the definition does not by its terms apply to the criminal statute that makes it unlawful for a sex offender “to reside” within 2000 feet of a school or daycare facility.Weems v. Little Rock Police Dep't, 453 F.3d 1010 (8th Cir. 2006), cert. denied, 550 U.S. 917, 127 S. Ct. 2128, 167 L. Ed. 2d 862 (2007).

Where the Sex Offender Screening and Risk Assessment Committee found that appellant was convicted of two separate sexual assaults on two separate women, admitted that he had been involved in forced sex acts, could not stand rejection, thought about raping, and said that raping made him feel better, there was substantial evidence to support the Committee's assessment of appellant as a level four offender. Because the Committee determined the presence of a mental abnormality or personality disorder by virtue of its review and assessment of appellant as a level four offender, the Committee complied with the provisions of this section.Parkman v. Sex Offender Screening & Risk Assessment Comm., 2009 Ark. 205, 307 S.W.3d 6 (2009).

Circuit court did not err in finding that it was required to order defendant to register as a sex offender because she pleaded guilty to permitting abuse of a minor, which was listed as a sex offense in the sex offender statute, and defendant failed to obtain a ruling from the circuit court on her overbreadth arguments.Pedraza v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 205, 465 S.W.3d 426 (2015) (decided under previous version of statute).

Denial of postconviction relief under Ark. R. Crim. P. 37.1 was proper, because correction of the judgment to reflect the requirements of the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997 (SORA), §12-12-901 et seq., did not demonstrate error so fundamental as to render the judgment void and subject to collateral attack pursuant to Ark. R. Crim. P. 37.1; since the petitioner pled guilty to false imprisonment in the first degree of a minor victim, which was a designated crime at the time he was sentenced pursuant to subdivision (13)(A)(i)(r) of this section, he was subject to SORA requirements regardless of whether it was reflected on the original judgment.Justus v. State, 2012 Ark. 91 (2012).

Appellant failed to state a claim for habeas corpus relief, because the trial court had to enter an amended judgment requiring him to register as a child or sexual offender under this section when he entered a plea of guilty to false imprisonment, theft of property, and domestic battery committed in the presence of a child.Justus v. Hobbs, 2013 Ark. 149 (2013).

Under subdivision (13)(A)(iii) of this section, once the State showed that defendant had been convicted of a sex offense requiring him to register as a sex offender in North Carolina, the State did not also have to show that the North Carolina offenses were similar to offenses requiring registration in Arkansas in order to support a conviction for failure to register; the statute reads in the disjunctive.Martin v. State, 2018 Ark. App. 143, 545 S.W.3d 785 (2018).

Defendant was required to register as a sex offender where a trial court specifically found him guilty of stalking and ordered the registration.Brawner v. State, 2013 Ark. App. 413, 428 S.W.3d 600 (2013).

Cited: Fleming v. State, 2014 Ark. App. 235 (2014).

(1)(A)A person is guilty of a Class C felony who:

Fails to register or verify registration as required under this subchapter;

Fails to report in person a change of address, employment, education, or training as required under this subchapter;

Refuses to cooperate with the assessment process as required under this subchapter; or

Files false paperwork or documentation regarding verification, change of information, or petitions to be removed from the Arkansas Sex Offender Registry.

Upon conviction, a sex offender who fails or refuses to provide any information necessary to update his or her registration file as required by § 12-12-906(b)(2) is guilty of a Class C felony.

If a sex offender fails or refuses to provide any information necessary to update his or her registration file as required by § 12-12-906(b)(2), as soon as administratively feasible the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, the Arkansas State Hospital, or the Department of Human Services shall contact the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction to report the violation of subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section.

Delayed reporting a change in address because of:

An eviction;

A natural disaster; or

Any other unforeseen circumstance; and

Provided the new address to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person no later than five (5) business days after the person establishes residency.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (a)(1)(A)(iv).

The 2015 amendment substituted “local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction” for “Arkansas Crime Information Center” in (a)(2)(B).

The 2017 amendment inserted “in person” in (a)(1)(A)(ii); and substituted “in person” for “in writing” in (a)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1)(B)(ii), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and“Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”.

Cross References. Fines, 5-4-201.

Imprisonment, 5-4-401.

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutes Imposing Criminal Penalties for Failure to Register as Required Under Sex Offender or Other Criminal Registration Statutes. 33 A.L.R.6th 91.

Validity of State Sex Offender Registration Laws Under Ex Post Facto Prohibitions. 63 A.L.R.6th 351.

Validity, Construction and Application of State Sex Offender Registration Statutes Concerning Level of Classification — General Principles, Evidentiary Matters, and Assistance of Counsel. 64 A.L.R.6th 1.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Sex Offender Registration Statutes Concerning Level of Classification — Claims for Downward Departure. 66 A.L.R.6th 1.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Sex Offender Registration Statutes Concerning Level of Classification — Claims Challenging Upward Departure. 67 A.L.R.6th 1.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

Where defendant was convicted of a sex offense and registered as a sex offender in another state, and while living in Arkansas for five years he was convicted of breaking and entering and felony theft of property and was given suspended sentences, but all the while he failed to register as a sex offender as required by §12-12-905(a)(2) of the Sex Offender Registration Act, §12-12-901 et seq., his failure to register or report a change of address was a Class D felony, and the state met its burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that defendant violated a condition of his suspended sentences. Williams v. State, 351 Ark. 229, 91 S.W.3d 68 (2002).

Defendant's conviction under subdivision (a)(1) of this section was affirmed because defendant had previously been ordered to register as a sex offender in Louisiana, and his failure to do so in Arkansas was sufficient to support his conviction. Flowers v. State, 92 Ark. App. 337, 213 S.W.3d 648 (2005).

Because the failure to register as a sex offender was a strict liability offense under §12-12-901 et seq. and the state proved that defendant was required to register but failed to do so, the trial court did not err by denying defendant's motion for a directed verdict.Adkins v. State, 371 Ark. 159, 264 S.W.3d 523 (2007).

Trial court did not utilize defendant's failure to register as a sex and child offender as an additional ground to support the revocation of his suspended sentence because the trial court merely entered a judgment declaring defendant guilty of that charge and pronounced a prison sentence on the registration violation for which he was originally given a suspended sentence; imposition of the sentence was separate and apart from the revocation and was well within the discretion of the trial court.Lowe v. State, 2010 Ark. App. 284 (2010).

Section §12-12-909 requires sex offenders to report changes in employment 10 days before they occur and this section provides sex offenders with an affirmative defense if they notify authorities no later than five days after changing employment; reading the two statutes together makes it clear that a defendant must notify authorities 10 days prior to changing employment, absent an affirmative defense, and since the loss of employment constitutes a change, this section and §12-12-903 do not allow a 30-day grace period for reporting a change in employment. Mashburn v. State, 87 Ark. App. 89, 189 S.W.3d 73 (2004).

Trial court did not clearly err in finding that defendant made no effort to comply with sexual-offender registration requirements. Therefore, the trial court properly revoked defendant's suspended sentence.Muldrew v. State, 2012 Ark. App. 568 (2012).

Defendant's conviction for failure to register as a sex offender, or failure to report a change of address, in violation of this section was appropriate because the evidence supported a legitimate inference that he lied when he claimed to continue to live at a residence. The only evidence offered on his behalf was the allegation that he continued to live at the residence without furniture or water, while he allowed the grass to become overgrown.Morrison v. State, 2009 Ark. App. 681, 374 S.W.3d 8 (2009).

Probation of defendant, a registered sex offender, was properly revoked for failing to comply with sex offender registration and reporting requirements, as required by this section, because defendant admitted that he was told that he could not live at a residential care facility which abutted a daycare but he did not move or provide another address for sex offender registry.Gray v. State, 2010 Ark. App. 159 (2010).

During defendant's trial for failure to register as a sex offender, the admission of a judgment and commitment order from a 2004 conviction on a charge of failure to register as a sex offender was neither prejudicial nor probative because the offense was a strict-liability offense; at worst, the evidence could be viewed as irrelevant or cumulative.Reed v. State, 2012 Ark. App. 225 (2012).

Defendant's convictions for failure to comply with registration and reporting requirements applicable to sex offenders and for residing within 2000 feet of a daycare facility as a level 4 sex offender were proper where the evidence supported a finding that he resided in a particular trailer that was shown to be within 2000 feet of a daycare facility because: (1) there was evidence that the trailer's previous resident had moved out approximately two months earlier and that the utilities for the trailer had been reestablished in defendant's name; (2) men's clothing and toiletries were found in the trailer, as were prescription-medication bottles bearing defendant's name; (3) the owner of the trailer admitted that defendant had approached him three times about renting the trailer; (4) defendant's father admitted that defendant had intended to move to the trailer; and (5) defendant had a key to the trailer when arrested. Although defendant argued he was only in the trailer to do repair work, no evidence of repair work was observed in the trailer.Green v. State, 2013 Ark. App. 63 (2013).

Substantial evidence demonstrated that defendant had failed to register his correct address where the testimony showed that he had provided an address that did not exist.Morrow v. State, 2014 Ark. 510, 452 S.W.3d 90 (2014).

Evidence was sufficient to support a conviction for failing to register as a sex offender because defendant had been advised of his obligation to register, had been informed on how to register, and had been reporting for over 4 years. Despite defendant's excuses for failing to register after his release from jail, the State was not required to prove that defendant failed to register with any particular culpable mental state.Fleming v. State, 2014 Ark. App. 235 (2014).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of failure to comply with registration requirements under the Sex Offender Registration Act based on his failure to report a change of address because defendant, who registered as a homeless resident of Marion County, was required to wear an electronic ankle monitor with a GPS tracking system; with the use of the GPS technology, the State introduced documentation that defendant had not been in his usual overnight location in Marion County, or any other location in Marion County, for a period of 13 consecutive days; and, contrary to defendant's argument, the evidence established more than a mere temporary relocation to Boone County to periodically recharge his electronic ankle monitor.Wilson v. State, 2016 Ark. App. 164, 485 S.W.3d 698 (2016).

Circuit court did not err in finding that defendant violated the terms and conditions of his suspended imposition of sentence by committing the new offense of failing to register as a sex offender after he was released from incarceration; although defendant objected to the Arkansas Crime Information Center documents when the documents were introduced, he did not raise the Confrontation Clause basis for objection until after the evidence had been introduced and the State had rested its case and therefore that argument was waived.Allen v. State, 2020 Ark. App. 84, 596 S.W.3d 518 (2020).

Sex Offender Screening and Risk Assessment Committee's assessment of a sex offender as a level four offender based on convictions which occurred before the effective date of the Sex Offender Registration Act (SORA) did not violate the ex post facto prohibitions of U.S. Const., Art. 1, § 10 and Ark. Const., Art. 2, § 17. Despite subdivision (a)(1) of this section, which sets forth criminal sanctions for a sex offender's failure to report, the SORA is not a form of punishment; therefore, the Supreme Court of Arkansas holds that it cannot be considered a violation of the ex post facto clauses of the United States and Arkansas Constitutions.Parkman v. Sex Offender Screening & Risk Assessment Comm., 2009 Ark. 205, 307 S.W.3d 6 (2009).

Circuit court did not err in denying defendant's motion to dismiss the charges under this section where defendant had knowledge that he was required to register as a sex offender, and the statute had remained substantively unchanged since case law concluding that the statute was one of strict liability had been decided.Morrow v. State, 2014 Ark. 510, 452 S.W.3d 90 (2014).

Any agency or official subject to reporting requirements under this subchapter that knowingly fails to comply with the reporting requirements under this subchapter is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

The registration or registration verification requirements of this subchapter apply to a person who:

Is serving a commitment as a result of an acquittal on or after August 1, 1997, on the grounds of mental disease or defect for a sex offense, aggravated sex offense, or sexually violent offense; or

Was required to be registered under the Habitual Child Sex Offender Registration Act, former § 12-12-901 et seq.

Court verifying the fact that the conviction has been reversed, vacated, or set aside; or

Governor's office that the Governor has pardoned the registrant.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The Habitual Child Sex Offender Registration Act, former §12-12-901 et seq., referred to in subdivision (a)(5) of this section, was derived from Acts 1987, No. 587, §§ 1-10, which was subsequently repealed by Acts 1997, No. 989, § 23.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “registration verification” for “reregistration” or “reregister” throughout the section.

ALR.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutory Requirement that Person Convicted of Sexual Offense in Other Jurisdiction Register or Be Classified as Sexual Offender in Forum State. 34 A.L.R.6th 171.

Where defendant was convicted of a sex offense and registered as a sex offender in another state, and while living in Arkansas for five years he was convicted of breaking and entering and felony theft of property and was given suspended sentences, but all the while he failed to register as a sex offender as required by subdivision (a)(2) of this section in the Sex Offender Registration Act, §12-12-901 et seq., his failure to register or report a change of address was a Class D felony, and the state met its burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that defendant violated a condition of his suspended sentences. Williams v. State, 351 Ark. 229, 91 S.W.3d 68 (2002).

Sentencing court had authority to order the registration of a defendant as a sexual offender because the defendant had been adjudicated guilty of public sexual indecency, under §5-14-111, on or after August 1, 1997, and because §12-12-903(13)(B)(ii) did not restrict the sentencing court's authority to order registration for a person's conviction as a sex offender for a sexual offense neither enumerated in §12-12-903(13)(A)(i) nor included under the provisions of §12-12-903(13)(B)(ii).Fountain v. State, 103 Ark. App. 15, 285 S.W.3d 706 (2008).

Defendant was properly convicted of knowingly failing to register as a sex offender under 18 U.S.C. § 2250 because he was subject to the registration requirements under Haw. Rev. Stat. § 846E-2(a) upon his Hawaii sex offense conviction and he had a duty to re-register when he re-entered Arkansas pursuant to this section and §12-12-906.United States v. Brewer, 628 F.3d 975 (8th Cir. 2010), cert. denied, 565 U.S. 829, 132 S. Ct. 126, 181 L. Ed. 2d 48 (2011).

Circuit court properly denied defendant's motion to dismiss related to his conviction under §12-12-904 for failure to comply with sex offender reporting requirements where defendant, who had been convicted of rape in 1993 and was imprisoned before the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997 was enacted, argued that the 1993 order did not impose a registration requirement, as required by §12-12-906. Defendant was found guilty of committing a registerable sex offense, he was in prison on August 1, 1997, which according to this section and judicial interpretation, meant that the registration and verification requirements applied to him, and there was no legislative directive to apply the §12-12-906 requirement retroactively.Williams v. State, 2017 Ark. App. 526, 532 S.W.3d 614 (2017).

Trial court, upon resentencing, properly ordered defendant to register as a sex offender because, by pleading guilty to distributing, possessing, or viewing matter depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child, defendant was ineligible for any sentence under the First Offender Act and was required by law to comply with the statutory sex-offender-registration requirements.Wilson v. State, 2019 Ark. App. 116 (2019).

Defendant was required to register as a sex offender where a trial court specifically found him guilty of stalking and ordered the registration.Brawner v. State, 2013 Ark. App. 413, 428 S.W.3d 600 (2013).

Cited: Hammock v. State, 2009 Ark. App. 414, 322 S.W.3d 22 (2009).

(1)(A)(i)At the time of adjudication of guilt, the sentencing court shall enter on the judgment and commitment or judgment and disposition form that the offender is required to register as a sex offender and shall indicate whether the:

Offense is an aggravated sex offense;

Sex offender has been adjudicated guilty of a prior sex offense under a separate case number; or

Sex offender has been classified as a sexually dangerous person.

If the sentencing court finds the offender is required to register as a sex offender, then at the time of adjudication of guilt the sentencing court shall require the sex offender to complete the sex offender registration form prepared by the Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center pursuant to § 12-12-908 and shall forward the completed sex offender registration form to the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

A sex offender is not required to register as a sex offender under this subchapter if the:

Victim was under eighteen (18) years of age and the sex offender was no more than three (3) years older than the victim at the time of the sex offense;

Court determines that there was no evidence of force, compulsion, threat, or intimidation in the commission of the sex offense; and

Court does not otherwise order registration under § 12-12-903(13)(B)(i).

The Division of Correction shall ensure that a sex offender received for incarceration has completed the sex offender registration form.

If the Division of Correction cannot confirm that the sex offender has completed the sex offender registration form, the Division of Correction shall require the sex offender to complete the sex offender registration form upon intake, release, or discharge.

The Division of Community Correction shall ensure that a sex offender placed on probation or another form of community supervision has completed the sex offender registration form.

If the Division of Community Correction cannot confirm that the sex offender has completed the sex offender registration form, the Division of Community Correction shall require the sex offender to complete the sex offender registration form upon intake, release, or discharge.

The Arkansas State Hospital shall ensure that the sex offender registration form has been completed for any sex offender found not guilty by reason of insanity and shall arrange an evaluation by Community Notification Assessment.

If the Arkansas State Hospital cannot confirm that the sex offender has completed the sex offender registration form, the Arkansas State Hospital shall ensure that the sex offender registration form is completed for the sex offender upon intake, release, or discharge.

Any person living in this state who would be required to register as a sex offender in the jurisdiction in which he or she was adjudicated guilty or delinquent of a sex offense shall register as a sex offender in this state whether living, working, or attending school or other training in Arkansas.

A nonresident worker or student who enters the state shall register in compliance with the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. No. 109-248, as it existed on January 1, 2007.

A sex offender sentenced and required to register outside of Arkansas shall:

(a)Submit to assessment by Community Notification Assessment if he or she is at least eighteen (18) years of age at the time he or she enters this state to live, work, or attend school.

If he or she is under eighteen (18) years of age at the time he or she enters this state to live, work, or attend school, he or she shall submit to assessment by the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Family Treatment Program or other agency or entity authorized to conduct juvenile sex offender assessments;

Provide a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) sample if a sample is not already accessible to the State Crime Laboratory; and

(a)Pay the mandatory fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to be deposited into the DNA Detection Fund established by § 12-12-1119 within ninety (90) days from the date of registration.

Failure to pay the fee required under subdivision (a)(2)(C)(iii)(a) of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

(1)The registration file of a sex offender who is confined in a correctional facility or serving a commitment following acquittal on the grounds of mental disease or defect shall be inactive until the registration file is updated by the department responsible for supervision of the sex offender.

(1)(A)When registering a sex offender as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the sentencing court, the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, the Arkansas State Hospital, the Department of Human Services, or the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall:

Inform the sex offender of the duty to submit to assessment and to register and obtain the information required for registration as described in § 12-12-908;

Inform the sex offender that if the sex offender changes residency within the state, the sex offender shall give the new address and place of employment, education, higher education, or training to the center in writing no later than five (5) calendar days before the sex offender establishes residency or is temporarily domiciled at the new address;

(a)Inform the sex offender that if the sex offender changes residency to another state or enters another state to work or attend school, the sex offender must also register in that state regardless of permanent residency.

The sex offender shall register the new address and place of employment, education, higher education, or training with the center and with a designated law enforcement agency in the new state in person not later than five (5) calendar days after the sex offender establishes residency or is temporarily domiciled in the new state;

Obtain fingerprints, palm prints, and a photograph of the sex offender if these have not already been obtained in connection with the offense that triggered registration;

Obtain a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) sample if one has not already been provided;

Require the sex offender to complete the entire registration process, including, but not limited to, requiring the sex offender to read and sign a form stating that the duty of the sex offender to register under this subchapter has been explained;

Inform the sex offender that if the sex offender's address changes within the state or to another state due to an eviction, natural disaster, or any other unforeseen circumstance, the sex offender shall give the new address to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person no later than five (5) calendar days after the sex offender establishes residency;

Inform a sex offender who has been granted probation that failure to comply with the provisions of this subchapter may be grounds for revocation of the sex offender's probation; and

Inform a sex offender subject to lifetime registration under § 12-12-919 of the duty to:

Verify registration and obtain the information required for registration verification as described in subsections (g) and (h) of this section; and

Ensure that the information required for reregistration verification under subsections (g) and (h) of this section is provided to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction.

Any offender required to register as a sex offender must provide a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) sample, that is, a blood sample or saliva sample, upon registering if a sample has not already been provided to the State Crime Laboratory.

Any offender required to register as a sex offender who is entering the State of Arkansas must provide a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) sample, that is, a blood sample or saliva sample, upon registration and must pay the mandatory fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to be deposited into the DNA Detection Fund established by § 12-12-1119.

Review with the sex offender the duty to register and obtain current information required for registration as described in § 12-12-908;

Review with the sex offender the requirement that if the sex offender changes address within the state, the sex offender shall give the new address to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person no later than five (5) calendar days before the sex offender establishes residency or is temporarily domiciled at the new address;

Review with the sex offender the requirement that if the sex offender changes address to another state, the sex offender shall register the new address with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person and with a designated law enforcement agency in the new state in person not later than five (5) calendar days after the sex offender establishes residency or is temporarily domiciled in the new state if the new state has a registration requirement;

Require the sex offender to read and sign a form stating that the duty of the sex offender to register under this subchapter has been reviewed;

Inform the sex offender that if the sex offender's address changes within the state or to another state due to an eviction, natural disaster, or any other unforeseen circumstance, the sex offender shall give the new address to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person no later than five (5) calendar days after the sex offender establishes residency;

Review with the sex offender the consequences of failure to provide any information required by subdivision (b)(2) of this section;

Inform a sex offender subject to lifetime registration under § 12-12-919 of the duty to:

Verify registration and report the information required for registration verification as described in subsections (g) and (h) of this section; and

Ensure that the information required for registration verification under subsections (g) and (h) of this section is provided in person to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction; and

Review with a sex offender subject to lifetime registration under § 12-12-919 the consequences of failure to verify registration under § 12-12-904.
